Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Meetings and Action Without Meetings

48-57-101. Annual meeting.

At a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, a corporation with members shall hold annually a meeting of its members.

Annual membership meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office.

At the annual meeting:

The president and chief financial officer shall report on the activities and financial condition of the corporation; and

The members shall consider and act upon such other matters as may be raised consistent with the notice requirements of § 48-57-105.

The failure to hold an annual meeting at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation's bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.01.

Cross-References. Application of nonprofit corporation law, title 48, chs. 51-67, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

Business corporations, shareholders' meetings, title 48, ch. 17, part 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 44.

48-57-102. Special meeting.

A corporation with members shall hold a special meeting of members:

On call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized to do so by the charter or bylaws; or

Unless the charter otherwise provides, if the holders of at least ten percent (10%) of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting sign, date, and deliver to the corporation's secretary one (1) or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held.

If not otherwise fixed under § 48-57-103 or § 48-57-107, the record date for determining the members entitled to demand a special meeting is the date the first member signs the demand.

If a notice for a special meeting demanded under subdivision (a)(2) is not given pursuant to § 48-57-105 within one (1) month after the effective date of the written demand or demands under § 48-51-202, regardless of the requirements of subsection (d), any person or persons signing the demand or demands may set the time and place of the meeting and give notice pursuant to § 48-57-105.

Special meetings of members may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office.

Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by § 48-57-105 may be conducted at a special meeting of members.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.02; 1989, ch. 445, § 6.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-57-103. Court-ordered meeting.

A court of record having equity jurisdiction in the county where a corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located may summarily order a meeting to be held on application of:

Any member or other person entitled to participate in the annual meeting, and in the case of a public benefit corporation, the attorney general and reporter, if an annual meeting was not held within the earlier of six (6) months after the end of the corporation's fiscal year or fifteen (15) months after its last annual meeting; or

A member who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under § 48-57-102, or a person or persons entitled to call a special meeting and in the case of a public benefit corporation, the attorney general and reporter, if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within one (1) month after the date the demand was delivered to the corporation's secretary; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, determine the members entitled to participate and vote at the meeting, specify a record date for determining members entitled to notice of the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting (or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters), and enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting.

If the court orders a meeting, it may also order the corporation to pay the member's costs (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred to obtain the order.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.03.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-57-104. Action by written consent.

Action required or permitted by chapters 51-68 of this title to be taken at a meeting of members may be taken without a meeting if all members entitled to vote on the action consent in writing to taking such action without a meeting. If all members entitled to vote on the action consent in writing to taking such action without a meeting, the affirmative vote of the number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting shall be the act of the members. The action must be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each member entitled to vote on the action in one (1) or more counterparts, indicating each signing member's vote or abstention on the action and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

The charter may provide that any action required or permitted by chapters 51-68 of this title to be taken at a members' meeting may be taken without a meeting, and without prior notice, if consents in writing setting forth the action so taken are signed by the members having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be required to authorize or take the action at a meeting at which all memberships entitled to vote on the action were present and voted. The written consent shall bear the date of signature of the member who signs the consent and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

If not otherwise determined under § 48-57-103 or § 48-57-107, the record date for determining members entitled to take such action without a meeting is the date the first member signs the consent under subsection (a).

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document. Unless the charter, bylaws or a resolution of the board of directors provides for a reasonable delay to permit tabulation of written consents, the action taken by written consent shall be effective when written consents signed by sufficient members to take the action are delivered to the corporation.

If chapters 51-68 of this title or the charter requires that notice of proposed action be given to nonvoting members and the action is to be taken by consent of the voting members, then the corporation must give its nonvoting members written notice of the proposed action at least ten (10) days before the action is taken. The notice must contain or be accompanied by the same material that under chapters 51-68 of this title would have been required to be sent to nonvoting members in a notice of meeting at which the proposed action would have been submitted to the members for action.

If action is taken by less than unanimous written consent of the voting members, the corporation must give its nonconsenting voting members written notice of the action not more than ten (10) days after:

Written consents sufficient to take the action have been delivered to the corporation; or

Such later date that tabulation of consents is completed pursuant to an authorization under subsection (d).

The notice must reasonably describe the action taken and contain or be accompanied by the same material of this title, as would have been required to be sent to voting members in a notice of a meeting at which the action would have been submitted to the members for action.

The notice requirements in subsections (e) and (f) shall not delay the effectiveness of actions taken by written consent, and a failure to comply with such notice requirements shall not invalidate actions taken by written consent; provided, that this subsection (g) shall not be deemed to limit judicial power to fashion any appropriate remedy in favor of a member adversely affected by a failure to give such notice within the required time period.

An electronic transmission may be used to consent to an action, if the electronic transmission contains or is accompanied by information from which the corporation can determine the date on which the electronic transmission was signed and that the electronic transmission was authorized by the member, the member's agent or the member's attorney-in-fact.

Delivery of a written consent to the corporation under this section is delivery to the corporation's registered agent at its registered office or to the secretary of the corporation at its principal office (or to a designated mailing address such as a post office box if the United States Postal Service does not deliver to the corporation's principal office).

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.04; 2014, ch. 899, §§ 21, 22.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-57-105. Notice of meeting.

A corporation shall give notice consistent with its charter or bylaws of meetings of members in a fair and reasonable manner.

Any notice which conforms to the requirements of subsection (c) is fair and reasonable, but other means of giving notice may also be fair and reasonable when all the circumstances are considered.

Notice is fair and reasonable if:

The corporation notifies its members of the place, date and time of each annual and special meeting of members no fewer than ten (10) days nor more than two (2) months before the meeting date;

Notice of an annual meeting includes a description of any matter or matters which must be approved by the members under § 48-58-302, § 48-58-507, § 48-60-103, § 48-60-202, § 48-61-103, § 48-62-102 or § 48-64-102; and

Notice of a special meeting includes a description of the matter or matters for which the meeting is called.

Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an annual or special meeting of members is adjourned to a different date, time or place, notice need not be given of the new date, time or place, if the new date, time or place is announced at the meeting before adjournment. If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed under § 48-57-107, however, notice of the adjourned meeting must be given under this section to the members of record of the new record date.

When giving notice of an annual or special meeting of members, a corporation shall give notice of a matter a member intends to raise at the meeting if:

Requested in writing to do so by a person entitled to call a special meeting; and

The request is received by the secretary or president of the corporation at least ten (10) days before the corporation gives notice of the meeting.

A certificate of the secretary or other person giving the notice that the notice required by this section has been given shall, in the absence of fraud, be prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.05.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-2006, 5-2106, 5-2202, 5-2303, 5-2506.

48-57-106. Waiver of notice.

A member may waive any notice required by chapters 51-68 of this title, the charter, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver must be in writing, be signed by the member entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

A member's attendance at a meeting:

Waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the member at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon the member's arrival) objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting; and

Waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the member objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.06.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-2601.

48-57-107. Record date — Determining members entitled to notice and vote.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing the record date for determining the members entitled to notice of a members' meeting. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing such a record date, the board may fix a future date as such a record date. If no such record date is fixed, members at the close of business on the business day preceding the day on which notice is given, or if notice is waived, at the close of business on the business day preceding the day on which the meeting is held, are entitled to notice of the meeting.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing a date as the record date for determining the members entitled to vote at a member's meeting. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing such a record date, the board may fix a future date as such a record date. If no such record date is fixed, members on the date of the meeting who are otherwise eligible to vote are entitled to vote at the meeting.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner for determining a date as the record date for the purpose of determining the members entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any other lawful action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing such a record date, the board may fix in advance such a record date. If no such record date is fixed, members at the close of business on the day on which the board adopts the resolution relating thereto, or the sixtieth day prior to the date of such other action, whichever is later, are entitled to exercise rights.

A record date fixed under this section may not be more than seventy (70) days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of members occurs.

A determination of members entitled to notice of or to vote at a membership meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board fixes a new date for determining the right to notice or the right to vote, which it must do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than four (4) months after the record date for determining members entitled to notice of the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than four (4) months after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date for notice or voting continues in effect or it may fix a new record date for notice or voting.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.07.

48-57-108. Action by written ballot.

Except as otherwise restricted by the charter or bylaws, any action that may be taken at any annual, regular, or special meeting of members may be taken without a meeting if the corporation having members delivers a ballot to every member entitled to vote on the matter.

A ballot must:

Be in the form of a document;

Set forth each proposed action;

Provide an opportunity to vote for, or withhold a vote for, each candidate for election as a director; and

Provide an opportunity to vote for or against or abstain from each proposed action.

Approval by ballot pursuant to this section of action, unless the charter, bylaws, or chapters 51-68 of this title require a greater number of affirmative votes, is valid only when the number of votes cast by ballot equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action, and the number of approvals equals or exceeds the number of votes that would be required to approve the matter at a meeting at which the total number of votes cast was the same as the number of votes cast by ballot.

All solicitations for votes by ballot must:

Indicate the number of responses needed to meet the quorum requirements;

State the percentage of approvals necessary to approve each matter other than election of directors; and

Specify the time by which a ballot must be received by the corporation having members in order to be counted.

Except as otherwise permitted by the charter, bylaws or ballot, a ballot may not be revoked.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.08; 2014, ch. 899, § 23.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.